Utah statutes.
17B-1-1401.   Status of and provisions applicable to a basic local district.
A basic local district:
(1)  operates under, is subject to, and has the powers set forth in this
chapter; and
(2)  is not subject to Chapter 2a, Provisions Applicable to Different Types of
Local Districts.
